Massachusetts, session 194th, H941.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 57 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “,shotgun or bow and
arrow” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- or shotgun.
SECTION 2. Said section 57 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “director”, in line 15, the following words:- nor hunting any
bird or mammal with a bow and arrow.
of 1